Utah statutes.
32B-10-503.   Specific application requirements for scientific or educational use permit.

(1)  To obtain a scientific or educational use permit, a person shall comply with Section 32B-10-202.

(2)  The one-time special use permit fee for a scientific or educational use permit is $125.

